District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.27

Powers and duties of Director conferred on assistants and inspectors.

The powers and duties granted to and imposed on the Director by this subchapter, are also hereby granted to and imposed on his assistants and inspectors when acting under his instructions.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1224, ch. 118, § 27
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1
1981 Ed., § 10-131.
1973 Ed., § 10-129.
Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.